Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20264-204
Agent of foreign principal from adversary nation or foreign terrorist organization; registration required; exemption; supplements; contents; procedure; effect.

(1) No person shall act as an agent of a foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization unless such person has filed with the Attorney General a true and complete registration statement and supplements to such statement as required by this section or unless such person is exempt from registration under the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act. Except as otherwise provided under the act, every person who becomes an agent of a foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization shall, within ten days thereafter, file with the Attorney General, in duplicate, a registration statement, under oath on a form prescribed by the Attorney General. The obligation of such an agent to file a registration statement shall, after the tenth day of such person becoming such an agent, continue from day to day, and termination of such status shall not relieve such agent from the obligation to file a registration statement for the period during which such agent was an agent of a foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization. The registration statement shall include the following, which shall be regarded as material for the purposes of this subsection:

(a) The registrant's name, principal business address, and all other business addresses in the United States or elsewhere, and all residence addresses, if any;

(b) The status of the registrant, including:

(i) If an individual, such individual's citizenship;

(ii) If a partnership, the name, residence addresses, and citizenship of each partner and a true and complete copy of its partnership agreement;

(iii) If an association, corporation, organization, or any other combination of individuals, the name, residence addresses, and citizenship of each director and officer and of each person performing the functions of a director or officer and a true and complete copy of its charter, articles of incorporation, association, constitution, operating agreement, certificate of organization, articles of organization, and bylaws and any amendments thereto; and

(iv) A copy of every other instrument or document and a statement of the terms and conditions of every oral agreement relating to the registrant's organization, powers, and purposes, and a statement of ownership and control;

(c)(i) A comprehensive statement of the nature of the registrant's business;

(ii) A complete list of the registrant's employees and a statement of the nature of the work of each;

(iii) The name and address of every foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization for whom the registrant is acting, assuming or purporting to act, or has agreed to act;

(iv) The character of the business or other activities of every such foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization, and, if any such principal is not an individual, a statement of the ownership and control of each; and

(v) The extent, if any, to which each such foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization is supervised, directed, owned, controlled, financed, or subsidized, in whole or in part, by any government of a foreign country or foreign political party, or by any other foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization;

(d)(i) Copies of each written agreement and the terms and conditions of each oral agreement, including all modifications of such agreements, or, if no agreement exists, a full statement of all the circumstances, by reason of which the registrant is an agent of a foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization; and

(ii) A comprehensive statement of the nature and method of performance of each such agreement, and of the existing and proposed activity or activities engaged in or to be engaged in by the registrant as agent of a foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization for each such principal, including a detailed statement of any such activity that is a political activity;

(e) The nature and amount of any contributions, income, money, or thing of value that the registrant has received within the preceding one hundred eighty days from each such foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization, either as compensation or for disbursement or otherwise, and the form and time of each such payment and from whom received;

(f)(i) A detailed statement of every activity that the registrant is performing, assuming or purporting to perform, directing others to perform, or has agreed to perform for the registrant or for any person other than a foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization and that requires registration under this section, including a detailed statement of any such activity that is a political activity;

(ii) The name, business, and residence addresses, and if an individual, such individual's citizenship, of any such other person;

(iii) The extent to which each such other person is supervised, directed, owned, controlled, financed, or subsidized, in whole or in part, by any government of a foreign country or foreign political party or by any other foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization; and

(iv) The nature and amount of contributions, income, money, or thing of value, if any, that the registrant has received during the preceding one hundred eighty days from each such other person in connection with any of the activities referred to in subdivision (1)(f)(i) of this section, either as compensation or for disbursement or otherwise, and the form and time of each such payment and from whom received;

(g)(i) A detailed statement of the money and other things of value spent or disposed of by the registrant during the preceding one hundred eighty days in furtherance of or in connection with activities that require registration under this section and that have been undertaken by the registrant either as an agent of a foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization, for the registrant, or for any other person or in connection with any activities relating to the registrant becoming an agent of such principal; and

(ii) A detailed statement of any contributions of money or other things of value made by the registrant during the preceding one hundred eighty days, other than contributions prohibited under 52 U.S.C. 30121, as such section existed on April 1, 2025, in connection with an election to any political office or in connection with any primary election, convention, or caucus held to select candidates for any political office;

(h) Copies of each written agreement and the terms and conditions of each oral agreement, including all modifications of such agreements, or, if no agreement exists, a full statement of all the circumstances, by reason of which the registrant is performing, assuming or purporting to perform, directing others to perform, or has agreed to perform for the registrant, for a foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization, or for any other person, any activities that require registration under this section;

(i) Such other statements, information, or documents pertinent to the purposes of this subsection as the Attorney General, having due regard for the national security and the public interest, may from time to time require; and

(j) Such further statements and such further copies of documents as are necessary to make the statements made in the registration statement and supplements to such statement, and the copies of documents furnished therewith, not misleading.

(2) Every agent of a foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization who has filed a registration statement required by subsection (1) of this section shall, within thirty days after the expiration of each period of six months succeeding such filing, file with the Attorney General a supplement to such statement under oath, on a form prescribed by the Attorney General. Such statement shall set forth, with respect to such preceding six-month period, such facts as the Attorney General, having due regard for the national security and the public interest, deems necessary to make the information required under this section accurate, complete, and current with respect to such six-month period. In connection with the information furnished under subdivisions (1)(c), (d), (f)(i), and (h) of this section, the registrant shall give notice to the Attorney General of any change therein within ten days after such change occurs. If the Attorney General, having due regard for the national security and the public interest, determines that it is necessary to carry out the purposes of the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act, the Attorney General may, in any particular case, require supplements to the registration statement to be filed at more frequent intervals with respect to all or particular items of information to be furnished.

(3) The registration statement and supplements to such statement shall be executed under oath as follows:

(a) If the registrant is an individual, by such individual;

(b) If the registrant is a partnership, by the majority of the partners thereof; and

(c) If the registrant is a person other than an individual or a partnership, by a majority of the officers thereof or persons performing the functions of officers or by a majority of the board of directors thereof or persons performing the functions of directors, if any.

(4) The fact that a registration statement or supplement has been filed shall not:

(a) Necessarily be deemed full compliance with the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act on the part of the registrant;

(b) Indicate that the Attorney General has in any way passed upon the merits of such statement or supplement; or

(c) Preclude liability for willfully:

(i) Failing to file a registration statement or supplement when due; or

(ii) Making a false statement of a material fact in such statement, supplement, or any other document filed with or furnished to the Attorney General under the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act.

(5) If any agent of a foreign principal required to register under the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act has previously registered with the Attorney General under the act, the Attorney General, in order to eliminate inappropriate duplication, may permit the incorporation by reference in the registration statement or supplements of any information or documents previously filed by such agent.

Laws 2025, LB644, § 4.